Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-359
County board; expenditures authorized.

In order to perform animal damage control, the county board of each county may make necessary expenditures from any funds of the county as are available for such purpose.

Laws 1945, c. 53, § 2, p. 238;

Laws 1987, LB 102, § 3.